Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-302
Insurance law; companies and persons amenable.

All domestic insurance companies, and all insurance agents, solicitors, brokers, surveyors or adjusters doing business in this state, and all insurance business transacted in whole or in part within or outside this state, the subject and matter of which is located wholly or in part in this state, shall be subject to and be governed by this chapter, and the records of such insurance company, agent, solicitor, broker, surveyor or adjuster doing business in this state shall be subject to inspection and examination of the Department of Insurance.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 35, p. 413;

R.S.1913, § 3171;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 6, p. 591;

C.S.1922, § 7771;

C.S.1929, § 44-306;

R.S.1943, § 44-302.